Utah statutes.
53A-24-110.7.   Appropriation for assistive technology devices and services.

(1) Subject to future budget constraints, there is appropriated, as an ongoing appropriation, from the Uniform School Fund for fiscal year 2001-02, $75,000 to the State Board of Education to be distributed to the State Office of Rehabilitation to purchase assistive technology devices and services in accordance with rules made by the State Board of Education.

(2)  The office shall use the appropriation to provide:

(a)  assistance to individuals with disabilities in acquiring, customizing, and learning to use and maintain assistive technology to facilitate their independence; and

(b)  support through Independent Living Centers and other similar programs to facilitate interagency cooperation in providing assistive technology devices and services.



Amended by Chapter 328, 2001 General Session

